Washington statutes.
RCW 41.24.020

Enrollment of firefighters—Death, disability, retirement benefits.

(1) Every municipal corporation maintaining and operating a regularly organized fire department shall make provision by appropriate legislation for the enrollment of every firefighter under the relief provisions of this chapter for the purpose of providing protection for all its firefighters and their families from death, sickness, injury, or disability arising in the performance of their duties as firefighters. Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit any municipality from providing such additional protection for relief as it may deem proper.

(2) Any municipal corporation maintaining and operating a regularly organized fire department may make provision by appropriate legislation allowing any member of its fire department to enroll under the retirement pension provisions of this chapter.

(3) Every municipal corporation shall make provisions for the collection and payment of the fees provided under this chapter, and shall continue to make such provisions for all firefighters who come under this chapter as long as they shall continue to be members of its fire department.

[ 1999 c 148 s 2; 1989 c 91 s 9; 1945 c 261 s 2; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 9578-16.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1989 c 91: See note following RCW 41.24.010.